Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 2. Insolvency

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

10 Am. Jur. 2d Banks and Financial Institutions §§ 1028 to 1161.

9 C.J.S. Banks and Banking §§ 127 to 229.

§ 13-4-201.
Conditions.

A bank is insolvent when any of the following conditions exist:

When the actual cash market value of its assets is less than its liabilities;

When it fails to make good its reserve as may be required by this act, or the federal reserve board; or

When it fails to pay, in the manner commonly accepted by business practices including draft or cashier’s check, its legal obligations to depositors on demand or to discharge any certificates of deposit, promissory notes or other indebtedness when due.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 80; R.S. 1931, § 10-501; C.S. 1945, § 35-501; W.S. 1957, § 13-127; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1979, ch. 34, § 1; 1988, ch. 59, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to determination of insolvency under Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act, see § 34-14-103.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a)(ii), see § 13-1-101(a)(xiv).

Court jurisdiction. —

When bank is in hands of state examiner for liquidation, the district court has no legal authority to deal with its affairs unless authorized by statute. State ex rel. Richmond v. District Court, 45 Wyo. 29, 14 P.2d 673,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1932).

Subrogation of surety. —

Where state funds are deposited under depository act, sureties therein succeed to any preference right which state may have. National Sur. Co. v. Morris, 34 Wyo. 134, 241 P. 1063,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1925).

Cited

in

Wilde v. Richards, 49 Wyo. 408, 55 P.2d 476,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(1936).

§ 13-4-202.
Transactions deemed void.

The following transactions subsequent to any act of insolvency or in contemplation of insolvency with a view to prevent the application of bank assets in the manner prescribed by this act or with a view to the preference of one creditor over another are void:

All transfers of notes, bonds, bills of exchange or other evidence of debt owing to any bank or of deposits to its credit;

All assignments of mortgages, securities or real estate or of judgments or decrees in its favor;

All deposits of money or other valuables for its use or for the use of any of its shareholders or creditors; and

All payments of money to either shareholders or creditors.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 81; R.S. 1931, § 10-502; C.S. 1945, § 35-502; W.S. 1957, § 13-128; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to fraudulent insolvency, see §

13-10-103

.

As to publication of notices required by law, see §

1-6-201

et seq.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the introductory language of subsection (a), see § 13-1-101(a)(xiv).

Transfer of realty contract. —

Alleged agreement by which depositor's claim was liquidated by transfer of realty contract to depositor when bank was insolvent was void as attempted preference of depositor. Claus v. Farmers & Stockgrowers State Bank, 51 Wyo. 45, 63 P.2d 781,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1936).

Fact that depositor's name was omitted from list

of depositors to be paid in full as result of transaction by which directors bought assets of bank at more than their real value and raised money to pay depositors was not sufficient to invalidate entire transaction as to other bank creditors. Claus v. Farmers & Stockgrowers State Bank, 51 Wyo. 45, 63 P.2d 781,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1936).

Transfer from commercial to savings department. —

Depositor, whose unsecured note was transferred from commercial to savings department without his knowledge after bank's insolvency and after he had been dissuaded from paying note, was entitled to retransfer of note to commercial department, restoration of securities exchanged therefor to savings department and to set off liability on note against bank's liability on deposit in commercial department. Wilde v. Richards, 49 Wyo. 408, 55 P.2d 476,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 1936).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

When is national bank's transaction “in contemplation” of insolvency, so as to be void under 12 USC § 91, 109 ALR Fed 247.

§ 13-4-203.
Impairment of capital; generally.

If the state banking commissioner has reason to believe that the capital of any bank is impaired he shall examine the bank and ascertain the facts. If he finds an impairment of capital, he shall provide written notice to each director of the bank and require the bank to restore the deficiency within sixty (60) days after the date of the notice. Written notice under this section may be provided by electronic transmission, consistent with W.S. 17-16-141(c).

After the directors of a bank have received written notice to restore a deficiency under subsection (a) of this section, the directors shall, within fifteen (15) days from the date of the notice, levy an assessment upon the common stock of the bank to repair the deficiency. Written notice of the deficiency and the amount of the assessment shall be provided to each shareholder, and may be provided by electronic transmission, consistent with W.S. 17-16-141(c). If any shareholder fails to pay the assessment within thirty (30) days of receiving notice, the directors of the bank may sell the stock of the shareholder to the highest bidder at public auction. Notice of the sale shall be published for ten (10) days in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county where the bank is located and a copy of the notice of sale shall be served on the owner of the stock personally or by mail at his last known address ten (10) days before the day of sale. The stock may be sold at private sale without public notice. Before a private sale an offer in writing shall first be obtained and a copy of the offer served upon the owner of record of the stock either personally or by mailing a copy of the offer to his last known address. If, after service of the offer, the owner still fails to pay the assessment within two (2) weeks from the time of the service of the offer, the directors may accept the private offer or a larger offer. The stock shall not be sold for less than the amount of the assessment and cost of sale. Out of the proceeds of the sale the directors shall pay the assessment and the cost of sale and the balance shall be paid to the person whose stock has been sold. A sale of stock cancels the outstanding certificate evidencing the stock sold. A new certificate shall be issued by the bank to the purchaser.

through (e) Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 135, § 2; ch. 146, § 2.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 26, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 35-505; W.S. 1957, § 13-131; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1986, ch. 42, § 1; 1987, ch. 125, § 1; 1991, ch. 135, § 2; ch. 146, § 2; ch. 240, § 1; 2019 ch. 30, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a), inserted “provide written notice to each director of the bank and” following “he shall,” substituted “notice” for “request,” and added the last sentence; in (b), substituted “After the directors of a bank have received written notice” for “The directors of each bank which has been requested” at the beginning, inserted “under subsection (a) of this section, the directors” following “restore a deficiency,” substituted “deficiency” for “request” in the second sentence, deleted “of” preceding “the amount,” substituted “provided” for “mailed” following “assessment shall be,” “shareholder, and may be provided by electronic transmission, consistent with W.S. 17-16-141(c)” for “stockholder at his last known address, or served personally upon him” at the end of the second sentence, “shareholder” for “stockholder” twice in the third sentence, and “receiving” for “mailing or serving the” in the third sentence.

Cross references. —

As to exemption of preferred stock from assessment, see §

13-2-308

.

§ 13-4-204.
Impairment of capital; reduction of capital.

The stockholders of any bank may remove an impairment of capital by reducing the stated capital of the bank if the reductions do not place the capital below the amount required by law to be maintained.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 26, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 35-507; W.S. 1957, § 13-133; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1.

§ 13-4-205.
Impairment of capital; failure to restore.

If any board of directors fails to comply with any request to restore an impairment of capital for a period of more than thirty (30) days after a request is made by the state banking commissioner, the bank is conclusively presumed to be insolvent and the state banking commissioner shall immediately take possession of the bank and proceed to liquidate it as provided by law.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 26, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 35-506; W.S. 1957, § 13-132; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

§ 13-4-206.
Voluntary liquidation.

By prior notification to the state banking commissioner the board of directors of a bank may place its assets under the control of the state banking commissioner for liquidation.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 106; R.S. 1931, § 10-527; C.S. 1945, § 35-541; W.S. 1957, § 13-168; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1988, ch. 59, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

§ 13-4-207.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1988, ch. 59, §§ 1, 2.

Cross references. —

As to voluntary liquidation, see §

13-4-206

.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 108, related to voluntary liquidation.